Utah statutes.
36-2-5.   Duties of Legislative Compensation Commission.

(1)  The Legislative Compensation Commission shall:

(a)  study and formulate recommendations concerning the salary levels for Utah state legislators;

(b)  base the study and recommendations upon maintaining a citizen Legislature in Utah, but compensating members fairly for their service in order that all individuals would have an opportunity to serve;

(c)  in developing recommendations, consider the salaries of other similar state legislators and other such factors; and

(d)  submit to each member of the Legislature, by January 2nd of each even-numbered year, recommendations:

(i)  concerning changes, if any, which should be made in the salary plan and its administration for state legislators; and

(ii)  include a recitation of the provisions of Section 36-2-3.

(2)  The Legislative Compensation Commission may issue reports subsequent to January 2 of an even-numbered year containing revised salary recommendations, including salary recommendations contingent upon certain action being taken by the Legislature.

(3)  As provided in Subsection 36-2-3(1)(c), in formulating its recommendations, the commission may take into account the amounts received by legislators for legislative expenses, but may not review the propriety of, or recommend amounts for, legislative expenses.

